District of Columbia statutes.
2-1565.05

Integration with learning standards.

Local Education Agencies may seek the cooperation of the Council on the integration of Youth Council experience into relevant District of Columbia learning standards and toward meeting graduation requirements.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-251, § 6, 55 DCR 9247